test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Ж_Ф-рука_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - рука M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      рука+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: рука́
      рука+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: ру́ку
      рука+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: руки́
      рука+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: руке́
      рука+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: руке́
      рука+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: руко́й
      рука+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: ру́ки
      рука+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: ру́ки
      рука+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: ру́к
      рука+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: рука́х
      рука+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: рука́м
      рука+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: рука́ми
